Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.610

Supplemental transportation improvements.

If the legislative authority of a city provides or contracts for supplemental transportation improvements, as described in RCW 35.21.925 or under chapter 36.73 RCW, a metropolitan municipal corporation serving the city or border jurisdictions shall coordinate its services with the supplemental transportation improvements to maximize efficiencies in public transportation services within and across service boundaries.

[ 2010 c 251 s 4.]